Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 8
DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS

7-58-801. Board of directors.

A limited cooperative association must have a board of directors of at least three individuals unless the association has fewer than three members. If the association has fewer than three members, the number of directors may not be fewer than the number of members.

The affairs of a limited cooperative association must be managed by, or under the direction of, the board of directors. The board may adopt policies and procedures that do not conflict with the articles, bylaws, or this article.

An individual is not an agent for a limited cooperative association solely by being a director.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 790, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-802. No liability as director for limited cooperative association's obligations.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the association and is not a debt, obligation, or liability of a director solely by reason of being a director. An individual is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, for an obligation of an association solely by reason of being a director.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 791, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-803. Qualifications of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, and subject to subsection (3) of this section, each director of a limited cooperative association must be an individual who is a member of the association or an individual who is designated by a member that is not an individual for purposes of qualifying and serving as a director; except that initial directors need not be members or designees of a member. A director must be at least eighteen years of age.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a director may be an officer or employee of the limited cooperative association.

If the articles or bylaws provide for nonmember directors, the number of nonmember directors may not exceed:

One, if there are two to four directors;

Two, if there are five to eight directors; or

One-third of the total number of directors if there are at least nine directors.

The articles or bylaws may provide qualifications for directors in addition to those in this section.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 791, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-804. Election of directors and composition of board.

Unless the articles or bylaws require a greater number:

The number of directors that must be patron members may not be fewer than:

One, if there are two or three directors;

Two, if there are four or five directors;

Three, if there are six to eight directors; or

One-third of the directors if there are at least nine directors; and

A majority of the board of directors must be elected exclusively by patron members.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, directors who are investor members and who are not elected exclusively by patron members must be elected by the investor members.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, all nonmember directors, if any, must be elected by the patron members and the investor members.

Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the articles or bylaws may provide for the election of all or a specified number of directors by one or more districts or classes of members.

Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the articles or bylaws may provide for the nomination or election of directors by districts or classes, directly or by district delegates.

If a class of members consists of a single member, the articles or bylaws may provide for the member to appoint a director or directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, cumulative voting for directors is prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided by the articles, bylaws, subsection (6) of this section, or section 7-58-303, 7-58-516, 7-58-517, or 7-58-809, member directors must be elected at an annual members meeting.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 791, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-805. Term of director.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, and subject to subsections (3) and (4) of this section and section 7-58-304 (4), the term of a director expires at the annual members meeting following the director's election or appointment.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a director may be reelected.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a director continues to serve until a successor director is elected or appointed and qualifies or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a director shall not serve the remainder of the director's term if the director ceases to qualify to be a director.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 792, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-806. Resignation of director.

A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association. Unless the notice states a later effective date, a resignation is effective when the notice is received by the association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 792, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-807. Removal of director.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide:

Members may remove a director with or without cause.

A member or members holding at least ten percent of the total voting power entitled to be voted in the election of a director may demand removal of the director by one or more signed petitions submitted to the officer of the limited cooperative association charged with keeping its records.

Upon receipt of a petition for removal of a director, an officer of the association or the board of directors shall:

Call a special meeting of members to be held not later than ninety days after receipt of the petition by the association; and

Mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to the members entitled to vote on the removal, and to the director to be removed, notice of the meeting that complies with section 7-58-508.

A director is removed if the votes in favor of removal are equal to or greater than the votes required to elect the director.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 792, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-808. Suspension of director by board.

A board of directors may suspend a director if, considering the director's course of conduct and the inadequacy of other available remedies, immediate suspension is necessary for the best interests of the association and the director is engaging, or has engaged, in:

Fraudulent conduct with respect to the association or its members;

Gross abuse of the position of director;

Intentional or reckless infliction of harm on the association; or

Any other behavior, act, or omission as provided by the articles or bylaws.

A suspension under subsection (1) of this section is effective for a period determined by the board of directors, not to exceed sixty days, unless, before the end of the suspension period, the board calls and gives notice of a special meeting of members for removal of the director, in which case the suspension is effective until the earlier of adjournment of the members meeting or removal of the director.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 793, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-809. Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a vacancy on the board of directors must be filled:

Within a reasonable time by majority vote of the remaining directors, until the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members is called to fill the vacancy; and

For the balance of the unexpired term by members at the next annual members meeting or a special meeting of members called to fill the vacancy.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, if a vacating director was elected or appointed by a class of members or a district:

The new director must be of that class or district; and

The selection of the director for the unexpired term must be conducted in the same manner as would the selection for that position without a vacancy.

If a member appointed a vacating director, the articles or bylaws may provide for that member to appoint a director to fill the vacancy.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 793, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-810. Remuneration of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, the board of directors may set the remuneration of directors and of nondirector committee members appointed under section 7-58-817 (1).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 794, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-811. Meetings.

A board of directors shall meet at least annually and may hold meetings inside or outside this state.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a board of directors may permit directors to attend or conduct board meetings through the use of any means of communication if all directors attending the meeting can communicate with each other during the meeting.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 794, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-812. Action without meeting.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws, any action that may be taken by a board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents in a record to the action.

Consent under subsection (1) of this section may be withdrawn by a director in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives consent from all directors.

A record of consent for any action under subsection (1) of this section may specify the effective date or time of the action.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 794, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-813. Meetings - notice.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a board of directors may establish a time, date, and place for regular board meetings, and notice of the time, date, place, or purpose of those meetings is not required.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, notice of the time, date, and place of a special meeting of a board of directors must be given to all directors at least three days before the meeting, the notice must contain a statement of the purpose of the meeting, and the meeting is limited to the matters contained in the statement.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 794, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-814. Waiver of notice of meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a director's participation in a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless:

The director objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken at the meeting; or

The director promptly objects upon the introduction of any matter for which notice under section 7-58-813 is required and has not been given and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken on the matter.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 795, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-815. Quorum.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide for a greater number, a majority of the total number of directors specified by the articles or bylaws constitutes a quorum for a meeting of the directors.

If a quorum of the board of directors is present at the beginning of a meeting, any action taken by the directors present is valid even if withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being fewer than the number required for a quorum.

A director present at a meeting but objecting to notice under section 7-58-814 (2) does not count toward a quorum.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 795, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-816. Voting.

Each director has one vote for purposes of decisions made by the board of directors.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present at a meeting is required for action by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 795, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-817. Committees.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more individuals to serve on a committee.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, an individual appointed to serve on a committee of a limited cooperative association need not be a director or member.

An individual who is not a director and is serving on a committee has, with respect to the subject matter of the committee, the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on the committee.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, and subject to the oversight responsibility of the board of directors, each committee of a limited cooperative association may exercise the powers delegated to it by the board of directors, but a committee may not:

Approve allocations or distributions except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

Approve or propose to members action requiring approval of members; or

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 795, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-818. Standards of conduct and liability.

Except as otherwise provided in section 7-58-820:

The discharge of the duties of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title; and

The liability of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 796, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-819. Conflict of interest.

The law applicable to conflicts of interest relating to a director of an entity organized under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title, governs conflicts of interest relating to a limited cooperative association and a director.

A director does not have a conflict of interest under this article or the articles and bylaws solely because the director's conduct relating to the duties of the director may further the director's own interest.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 796, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-820. Other considerations of directors.

Unless the articles otherwise provide, in considering the best interests of a limited cooperative association, a director of the association in discharging the duties of director, in conjunction with considering the long- and short-term interest of the association and its members, may consider:

The interest of employees, customers, and suppliers of the association;

The interest of the community in which the association operates; and

Other cooperative principles and values that may be applied in the context of the decision.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 796, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-821. Right of director or committee member to information.

A director or a member of a committee appointed under section 7-58-817 may obtain, inspect, and copy all information regarding the state of activities and financial condition of the limited cooperative association and other information regarding the activities of the association if the information is reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties as director or the committee member's duties as a member of the committee. Information obtained in accordance with this section may not be used by a director or a committee member in any manner that would violate any duty of or to the association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 796, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-822. Appointment and authority of officers.

A limited cooperative association has the officers:

Provided in the articles or bylaws; or

Established by the board of directors in a manner not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

The articles or bylaws may designate or, if the articles or bylaws do not designate, the board of directors shall designate, one of the association's officers for preparing all records required by section 7-58-112 and for the authentication of records.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, the board of directors shall appoint the officers of the limited cooperative association.

Officers of a limited cooperative association shall perform the duties the articles and bylaws prescribe or as authorized by the board of directors in a manner not inconsistent with the articles and bylaws.

The election or appointment of an officer of a limited cooperative association does not of itself create a contract between the association and the officer.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, an individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a limited cooperative association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 797, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-823. Resignation and removal of officers.

The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

An officer of a limited cooperative association may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the association. Unless the notice specifies a later time, the resignation is effective when the notice is received by the association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 797, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.